Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.34.160

Emergency expenditures—Warrants—Payment.

All expenditures for emergency purposes as provided in this chapter shall be paid by warrants from any available money in the fund properly chargeable with such expenditures. If, at any time, there is insufficient money on hand in a fund with which to pay such warrants as presented, the warrants shall be registered, bear interest, and be called in the same manner as other registered warrants as prescribed in RCW 35A.21.110.

[ 1985 c 175 s 48.]